Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-262
Issuance of process; notice in lieu of summons.

No summons or notice shall be required to be served on any person who shall voluntarily appear before the court and whose appearance is noted on the records thereof. In actions involving a juvenile who may invoke the jurisdiction of the court under the Nebraska Juvenile Code, the court, in its discretion, may cause the issuance of a notice in lieu of summons to the juvenile and to the juvenile's parent or the person who has the custody or control of the juvenile. Such notice in lieu of summons may be delivered by mail, shall be accompanied by a copy of the petition in cases when jurisdiction under subdivision (1) or (2) of section 43-247 is alleged, and shall contain a statement that (1) the recipient is entitled by statute to have the summons or notice, as the case may be, served upon him or her by personnel of the sheriff's office or some other person under the direction of the court, (2) service by the sheriff's office has been dispensed with for the convenience of the recipient, (3) if the recipient appears in court for the hearing fixed in the notice, he or she shall be deemed to have waived issuance and service of a notice and the seventy-two-hour waiting period, as the case may be, and (4) if he or she does not appear, a summons or notice, as the case may be, shall be served upon him or her by personnel of the sheriff's office or some other suitable person under the direction of the court.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 18;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 19.